Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2875
Delegated dispensing permit; complaint; investigation; costs.

If a complaint is filed against a delegated dispensing permittee or any staff member, volunteer, or consultant in association with work performed under a delegated dispensing permit and if the complaint is found to be valid, the cost of investigating the complaint and any followup inspections shall be calculated by the board based upon the actual costs incurred and the cost shall be borne by the permittee being investigated. All costs collected by the department shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund. If the complaint is not found to be valid, the cost of the investigation shall be paid from the fund.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 67;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 50;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 53;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.42;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 971.